Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 1. Application; Cooperation between Courts.

Sec. 13.27.010.
International application of this chapter.

A court of this state may treat a foreign country as if it were a state for the purpose of applying AS

13.27.010

—

13.27.210

,

13.27.400

,

13.27.410

, and

13.27.490

.

History.

(§ 29 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.27.020.
Communication between courts.

A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter. The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, the court shall make a record of the communication.

Courts may communicate concerning administrative matters that involve schedules, calendars, and court records without making a record.

History.

(§ 29 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.27.030.
Cooperation between courts.

In a guardianship or protective proceeding in this state, a court may request the appropriate court of another state to

hold an evidentiary hearing;

order a person in that state to produce evidence or give testimony under procedures of that state;

order that an evaluation or assessment be made of the respondent;

order any appropriate investigation of a person involved in a proceeding;

forward to the court a certified copy of the transcript or other record of a hearing under (1) of this subsection or any other proceeding, any evidence otherwise produced under (2) of this subsection, and any evaluation or assessment prepared in compliance with an order under (3) or (4) of this subsection;

issue any order necessary to assure the appearance in the proceeding of a person whose presence is necessary for the court to make a determination, including the respondent or the incapacitated or protected person;

issue an order authorizing the release of medical, financial, criminal, or other relevant information in that state, including protected health information as defined in 45 C.F.R. 160.103, as amended.

If a court of another state in which a guardianship or protective proceeding is pending requests assistance of the kind provided in (a) of this section, a court of this state has jurisdiction for the limited purpose of granting the request or making reasonable efforts to comply with the request.

History.

(§ 29 ch 53 SLA 2008; am § 11 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Sec. 13.27.040.
Taking testimony in another state.

In a guardianship or protective proceeding, in addition to other procedures that may be available, testimony of a witness who is located in another state may be offered by deposition or other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in another state. The court on its own motion may request that the testimony of a witness be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms on which the testimony is to be taken.

In a guardianship or protective proceeding, a court in this state may permit a witness located in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone or audiovisual or other electronic means. A court of this state shall cooperate with the court of the other state in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

History.

(§ 29 ch 53 SLA 2008)